Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1015.
do enact as follows:SB1015,11Section 1. 71.07 (9e) (aj) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1015,2,6271.07 (9e) (aj) (intro.) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2010, 3and before January 1, 2026, an individual may credit against the tax imposed under 4s. 71.02 an amount equal to one of the following percentages of the federal basic 5earned income credit for which the person is eligible for the taxable year under 6section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code:SB1015,27Section 2. 71.07 (9e) (ak) of the statutes is created to read:SB1015,2,14871.07 (9e) (ak) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, an 9individual may credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.02 an amount equal to 34 10percent of the federal basic earned income credit for which the individual is eligible 11for the taxable year under section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code, except that if an 12individual has no qualifying children the individual may credit against the tax 13imposed under s. 71.02 an amount equal to 15 percent of the federal basic earned 14income credit for which the individual is eligible for the taxable year.SB1015,2,1515